windows/es.aff
SFX W Y 2600
SFX W   iar   ío          iar
SFX W   ebrar iebro       ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedro       edrar
SFX W   egar  iego        egar
SFX W   elar  ielo        elar
SFX W   evar  ievo        evar
SFX W   emblar iemblo      emblar
SFX W   embrar iembro      embrar
SFX W   ar    o           andar
SFX W   endar iendo       endar
SFX W   endrar iendro      endrar
SFX W   engar iengo       engar
SFX W   ensar ienso       ensar
SFX W   entar iento       entar
SFX W   enzar ienzo       enzar
SFX W   erbar ierbo       erbar
SFX W   ernar ierno       ernar
SFX W   errar ierro       errar
SFX W   ertar ierto       ertar
SFX W   esar  ieso        esar
SFX W   estar iesto       estar
SFX W   etar  ieto        etar
SFX W   ezar  iezo        ezar
SFX W   ijar  íjo         [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  ílo         [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  íno         [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  íto         [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úmo         [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úso         [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  ízo         [ae]izar
SFX W   islar íslo        [ae]islar
SFX W   illar íllo        [ae]illar
SFX W   ullar úllo        [ae]ullar
SFX W   unar  úno         aunar
SFX W   ular  úlo         aular
SFX W   upar  úpo         aupar
SFX W   inar  íno         [ae]inar
SFX W   urtar úrto        ehurtar
SFX W   uar   úo          [^g]uar
SFX W   untar únto        euntar
SFX W   ar    o           guar
SFX W   onzar üenzo       gonzar
SFX W   obar  uebo        obar
SFX W   oblar ueblo       oblar
SFX W   ocar  ueco        ocar
SFX W   odar  uedo        odar
SFX W   ogar  uego        ogar
SFX W   olar  uelo        olar
SFX W   ollar uello       [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üeldo       goldar
SFX W   oldar ueldo       [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üello       gollar
SFX W   olcar uelco       olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgo       olgar
SFX W   oltar uelto       oltar
SFX W   onar  ueno        onar
SFX W   oñar  ueño        oñar
SFX W   ontar uento       ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentro      ontrar
SFX W   orar  uero        [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üero        gorar
SFX W   orcar uerco       orcar
SFX W   ordar uerdo       ordar
SFX W   ornar uerno       ornar
SFX W   ortar uerto       ortar
SFX W   orzar uerzo       orzar
SFX W   osar  ueso        osar
SFX W   ostar uesto       ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestro      ostrar
SFX W   ovar  uevo        ovar
SFX W   gar   ego         ugar
SFX W   er    igo         [cr]aer
SFX W   cer   zco         [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   go          [fh]acer
SFX W   er    go          aler
SFX W   caber quepo       caber
SFX W   cer   zco         ecer
SFX W   eder  iedo        eder
SFX W   er    o           [eo]er
SFX W   er    igo         oer
SFX W   er    yo          oer
SFX W   ender iendo       ender
SFX W   er    go          ener
SFX W   erer  iero        erer
SFX W   erner ierno       erner
SFX W   erder ierdo       erder
SFX W   erter ierto       erter
SFX W   ocer  uezo        cocer
SFX W   cer   zco         [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  uedo        oder
SFX W   oler  uelo        oler
SFX W   olver uelvo       olver
SFX W   er    go          oner
SFX W   orcer uerzo       orcer
SFX W   order uerdo       order
SFX W   over  uevo        over
SFX W   aber  é           saber
SFX W   ir    go          alir
SFX W   ebir  ibo         ebir
SFX W   ecir  igo         ecir
SFX W   edir  ido         edir
SFX W   egir  ijo         egir
SFX W   emir  imo         emir
SFX W   eír   ío          eír
SFX W   eñir  iño         eñir
SFX W   enchir incho       enchir
SFX W   endir indo        endir
SFX W   ir    go          enir
SFX W   entir iento       entir
SFX W   ernir ierno       ernir
SFX W   ertir ierto       ertir
SFX W   ervir irvo        [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir isto        estir
SFX W   eguir igo         eguir
SFX W   unir  úno         eunir
SFX W   erir  iero        erir
SFX W   etir  ito         etir
SFX W   ervir iervo       hervir
SFX W   irir  iero        irir
SFX W   ibir  íbo         ohibir
SFX W   ír    igo         oír
SFX W   orir  uero        orir
SFX W   ormir uermo       ormir
SFX W   ucir  uzco        ucir
SFX W   uir   uyo         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyo         güir
SFX W   ir    o           ullir
SFX W   ir    o           uñir
SFX W   eguir igo         eguir
SFX W   undir úndo        ehundir
SFX W   erguir yergo       erguir
SFX W   erguir irgo        erguir
SFX W   iar   ías         iar
SFX W   ebrar iebras      ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedras      edrar
SFX W   egar  iegas       egar
SFX W   elar  ielas       elar
SFX W   evar  ievas       evar
SFX W   emblar iemblas     emblar
SFX W   embrar iembras     embrar
SFX W   r     s           andar
SFX W   endar iendas      endar
SFX W   endrar iendras     endrar
SFX W   engar iengas      engar
SFX W   ensar iensas      ensar
SFX W   entar ientas      entar
SFX W   enzar ienzas      enzar
SFX W   erbar ierbas      erbar
SFX W   ernar iernas      ernar
SFX W   errar ierras      errar
SFX W   ertar iertas      ertar
SFX W   esar  iesas       esar
SFX W   estar iestas      estar
SFX W   etar  ietas       etar
SFX W   ezar  iezas       ezar
SFX W   ijar  íjas        [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  ílas        [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  ínas        [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  ítas        [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úmas        [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úsas        [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  ízas        [ae]izar
SFX W   islar íslas       [ae]islar
SFX W   illar íllas       [ae]illar
SFX W   ullar úllas       [ae]ullar
SFX W   unar  únas        aunar
SFX W   ular  úlas        aular
SFX W   upar  úpas        aupar
SFX W   inar  ínas        [ae]inar
SFX W   urtar úrtas       ehurtar
SFX W   uar   úas         [^g]uar
SFX W   untar úntas       euntar
SFX W   r     s           guar
SFX W   onzar üenzas      gonzar
SFX W   obar  uebas       obar
SFX W   oblar ueblas      oblar
SFX W   ocar  uecas       ocar
SFX W   odar  uedas       odar
SFX W   ogar  uegas       ogar
SFX W   olar  uelas       olar
SFX W   ollar uellas      [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üeldas      goldar
SFX W   oldar ueldas      [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üellas      gollar
SFX W   olcar uelcas      olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgas      olgar
SFX W   oltar ueltas      oltar
SFX W   onar  uenas       onar
SFX W   oñar  ueñas       oñar
SFX W   ontar uentas      ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentras     ontrar
SFX W   orar  ueras       [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üeras       gorar
SFX W   orcar uercas      orcar
SFX W   ordar uerdas      ordar
SFX W   ornar uernas      ornar
SFX W   ortar uertas      ortar
SFX W   orzar uerzas      orzar
SFX W   osar  uesas       osar
SFX W   ostar uestas      ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestras     ostrar
SFX W   ovar  uevas       ovar
SFX W   gar   egas        ugar
SFX W   r     s           a[bcl]er
SFX W   r     s           [cr]aer
SFX W   r     s           ecer
SFX W   eder  iedes       eder
SFX W   r     s           [eo]er
SFX W   ener  ienes       ener
SFX W   ender iendes      ender
SFX W   erder ierdes      erder
SFX W   erer  ieres       erer
SFX W   erner iernes      erner
SFX W   erter iertes      erter
SFX W   ocer  ueces       cocer
SFX W   r     s           [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  uedes       oder
SFX W   oler  ueles       oler
SFX W   olver uelves      olver
SFX W   r     s           oner
SFX W   orcer uerces      orcer
SFX W   order uerdes      order
SFX W   over  ueves       over
SFX W   r     es          alir
SFX W   ebir  ibes        ebir
SFX W   ecir  ices        ecir
SFX W   edir  ides        edir
SFX W   egir  iges        egir
SFX W   emir  imes        emir
SFX W   eír   íes         eír
SFX W   eñir  iñes        eñir
SFX W   eguir igues       eguir
SFX W   enchir inches      enchir
SFX W   endir indes       endir
SFX W   enir  ienes       enir
SFX W   entir ientes      entir
SFX W   ernir iernes      ernir
SFX W   ertir iertes      ertir
SFX W   ervir irves       [^h]ervir
SFX W   unir  únes        eunir
SFX W   erir  ieres       erir
SFX W   irir  ieres       irir
SFX W   etir  ites        etir
SFX W   estir istes       estir
SFX W   ervir ierves      hervir
SFX W   ibir  íbes        ohibir
