windows/es.dic
abarracar/PSVWX
abjurar/HPSVWX
abovedar/NPSVWX
abuchear/PSVWX
acachetear/PSVWX
acapillar/PSVWX
aceitar/PQSTVWXt
achicharrar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
acocear/PQSTVWXt
aconsejar/OPQRSTVWXrt
acrecentar/IOPQRSTWXrt
acuatizar/PSVWX
adargar/PSVWX
administrar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
adueñar/OPRSVWXr
afilar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
agachar/OPRSVWXr
agitar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
aguardar/OPQRSTVWXrt
ahorcajar/OPRSVWXr
ajuglarar/PSVWX
albergar/OPQRSTVWXrt
alentar/NOPQRSTWXrt
alicatar/PQSTVWXt
almibarar/PSVWX
alucinar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
amarinar/PSVWX
amontazgar/PQSTVWXt
anatomizar/PQSTVWXt
anular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
apedazar/PSVWX
aplomar/PSVWX
aquilatar/IPSVWX
arranchar/PSVWX
artillar/PSVWX
asombrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
atender/IOQRTWXrt
atrampar/OPQRSTVWXrt
avasallar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
azular/PSVWX
bambonear/PSVWX
basar/OPQRSTVWXrt
bifurcar/HOPRSVWXr
bonificar/HPQSTVWXt
bruñir/IQWYt
cabriolear/PSVWX
callear/PSVWX
capitular/HLMPSVWX
cascabelear/PSVWX
cencerrear/PSVWX
chapear/PSVWX
chispear/LPSVWX
circunscribir/OQRTVWXYrt
cocear/IPSVWX
comedir/INRWYo
comunicar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
conglomerar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
consumir/HIOQRTVWXrt
contravalar/HPSVWX
corporeizar/OPQRSTWXrt
criar/IOPQRSTWXrt
cuerpear/PQSTVWXt
decaer/IWY
deletrear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
depredar/HPSVWX
desacralizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desalinear/HPSVWX
desapolillar/PSVWX
desatornillar/PQSTVWXt
desbravar/PSVWX
descapullar/PQSTVWXt
descimbrar/IPSVWX
desconsiderar/HNPSVWX
descuerar/PSVWX
desembragar/PQSTVWXt
desencaminar/PSVWX
desengastar/PSVWX
desentorpecer/WX
desfigurar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
desguarnecer/WX
desimponer/QTWYq
deslizar/ILOPRSVWXr
desmilitarizar/HPQSTVWXt
desopinar/PQSTVWXt
despatarrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desplanchar/PSVWX
desrabotar/PSVWX
destoser/ORVWXr
desviar/HIOPQRSTUWXrtu
dibujar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
disciplinar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
distraer/IOQWYoq
duchar/OPQRSTVWXrt
emascular/HPQSTVWXt
embellaquecer/ORWXo
embotellar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
empachar/OPRSVWXr
empelechar/PSVWX
empotrerar/PSVWX
enastar/PSVWX
encambrar/PSVWX
encaratular/OPRSVWXr
encenizar/PSVWX
encofinar/PSVWX
encubrir/IOQRTVWYrt
enfervorecer/WX
engaratusar/PSVWX
engreír/OQRVWYoq
enjaquimar/PSVWX
enlozar/PSVWX
enquillotrar/PSVWX
ensabanar/PSVWX
ensordecer/IOQRTWXoq
entramar/PSVWX
entrillar/OPQRSTVWXrt
envergar/PSVWX
erradicar/HPQSTVWXt
escampar/PSVWX
esclafar/PSVWX
escullir/WY
espalar/PSVWX
esponsorizar/HPQSTVWXt
estatalizar/HPQSTVWXt
estrellar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
excitar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
exteriorizar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
familiarizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
fijar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
follar/OPQRSTUVWX
fregar/IOPQRSTUWXrtu
ganar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
gesticular/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
granar/PSVWX
guillotinar/PQSTVWXt
heñir/WY
higienizar/PQSTVWXt
horquillar/PSVWX
igualar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
impulsar/OPQRSTVWXrt
indoctrinar/PQSTVWXt
inmutar/HOPRSVWXr
intercomunicar/HPSVWX
irrigar/HPQSTVWXt
jijear/PSVWX
ladrillar/PSVWX
latir/LVWX
lignificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
lomear/PSVWX
magancear/PSVWX
mampostear/PSVWX
mapear/PQSTVWXt
martirizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
melgar/PSVWX
meteorizar/HPSVWX
mistar/PSVWX
monetizar/HPSVWX
movilizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
mutar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
nitrar/PQSTVWXt
octavar/PSVWX
organizar/HNOPQRSTUVWXrtu
palear/PQSTVWXt
parar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
patrullar/PSVWX
percutir/VWX
perturbar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
pintear/PSVWX
plantificar/HPQSTVWXt
pompear/PSVWX
precaver/NOQRTVWXrt
presentar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
profundizar/HPQSTVWXt
puar/PSWX
quemar/ILOPQRSTUVWXrtu
rallar/PSVWX
ratificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
rebalsar/PSVWX
recalentar/IOPQRSTWXrt
recobrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
recrujir/VWX
reencontrar/OPQRSTWXrt
regatear/PQSTVWXt
reinicializar/HOPQRSTVWX
remachar/PSVWX
rendir/HINOQWYoq
replegar/OPQRSTWXrt
resbalar/IOPRSVWXr
responsar/PSVWX
retinglar/PSVWX
revalidar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
ringar/PSVWX
rotar/HPSVWX
sabotear/PQSTVWXt
salvaguardar/PQSTVWXt
seguir/INOQWYoq
simular/HOPQRSTVWXrt
sobrecargar/PQSTVWXt
socarrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
sombrar/PSVWX
sotanear/PSVWX
sufrir/ILNQTVWXt
sutilizar/PQSTVWXt
tararear/PQSTVWXt
tembletear/PSVWX
timonear/PSVWX
torrar/PQSTVWXt
transfigurar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
trasformar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
trasvasar/PQSTVWXt
trivializar/HPQSTVWXt
turnar/OPRSVWXr
vacunar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
velejar/PSVWX
vigilar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
volver/OQRTUWYrtu
zaragatear/PSVWX
